Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-412.02
Civil cases; counties of 4,000 population or less; inadequate facilities; change of venue.

Any civil case pending in either the county court, the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Court, or the district court in any county having a population of four thousand or less and not having adequate facilities for the trial of jury or other contested cases may be tried in any adjoining county with the same effect as if tried in the county in which the case was filed or venued.

Laws 1975, LB 97, § 2;

Laws 1986, LB 811, § 13;

R.S.Supp.,1988, § 24-902.